Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-533
Cities of the second class; officers; terms.

Commencing with the primary election in 1976 and every two years thereafter, all elected officers in all cities of the second class shall be nominated at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide general election. All elected officers in a city of the second class shall serve for terms of four years or until their successors are elected and qualified.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 129.